Alaska, session 34, HB85.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in the fiscal year 2025 budget summary for the 03 operating budget by funding source to the agencies named for the purposes expressed for the 04 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, and ending June 30, 2025, unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 30,000 30,000 11 Commission 12 Alaska Oil and Gas 30,000 13 Conservation Commission 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 Population Management 4,100,000 4,100,000 18 Institution Director's Office 3,905,000 19 Regional and Community 195,000 20 Jails 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 Student Financial Aid Programs 975,000 975,000 25 Alaska Performance 650,000 26 Scholarship Awards 27 Alaska Education Grants 325,000 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 Subsistence Research & Monitoring 50,000 50,000 01 State Subsistence 50,000 02 Research 03 * * * * * * * * * * 04 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 Behavioral Health 3,100,000 3,100,000 07 Behavioral Health 3,100,000 08 Treatment and Recovery 09 Grants 10 Public Assistance 5,000,000 5,000,000 11 Energy Assistance 5,000,000 12 Program 13 Medicaid Services 228,599,000 14,200,000 214,399,000 14 Medicaid Services 228,599,000 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 Alaska Vocational Technical Center 888,600 888,600 19 Alaska Vocational 888,600 20 Technical Center 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 Agriculture 3,200,000 3,200,000 25 Agricultural Development 3,200,000 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 Taxation and Treasury 536,200 536,200 30 Alaska Retirement 512,900 31 Management Board 01 Permanent Fund Dividend 23,300 02 Division 03 * * * * * * * * * * 04 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 Highways, Aviation and Facilities 620,400 620,400 07 Central Region Highways 165,700 08 and Aviation 09 Northern Region Highways 454,700 10 and Aviation 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 University of Alaska 133,010,000 -28,600,000 161,610,000 15 Systemwide Services 15,520,000 16 Anchorage Campus 2,790,000 17 Fairbanks Campus 114,480,000 18 Juneau Campus 220,000 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 Alaska Court System 23 Trial Courts 0 24 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 05 1002 Federal Receipts 30,000 06 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $30,000 07 Department of Corrections 08 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 4,100,000 09 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $4,100,000 10 Department of Education and Early Development 11 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 975,000 12 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $975,000 13 Department of Fish and Game 14 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 50,000 15 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $50,000 16 Department of Health 17 1002 Federal Receipts 222,499,000 18 1003 General Fund Match 14,200,000 19 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $236,699,000 20 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 21 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 888,600 22 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $888,600 23 Department of Natural Resources 24 1002 Federal Receipts 3,200,000 25 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $3,200,000 26 Department of Revenue 27 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 182,000 28 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 203,000 29 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 116,800 30 1042 Judicial Retirement System 11,100 31 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 23,300 01 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $536,200 02 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 03 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 620,400 04 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $620,400 05 University of Alaska 06 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts -28,600,000 07 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 79,110,000 08 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 82,500,000 09 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $133,010,000 10 Judiciary 11 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 10,586,300 12 1271 ARPA Revenue Replacement -10,586,300 13 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $0 14 * * * Total Budget * * * $380,109,200 15 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General Funds 05 1003 General Fund Match 14,200,000 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 15,574,900 07 1271 ARPA Revenue Replacement -10,586,300 08 * * * Total Unrestricted General Funds * * * $19,188,600 09 Designated General Funds 10 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts -28,600,000 11 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 975,000 12 * * * Total Designated General Funds * * * $-27,625,000 13 Other Non-Duplicated Funds 14 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 182,000 15 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 203,000 16 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 116,800 17 1042 Judicial Retirement System 11,100 18 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 79,160,000 19 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 620,400 20 * * * Total Other Non-Duplicated Funds * * * $80,293,300 21 Other Duplicated Funds 22 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 23,300 23 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 82,500,000 24 * * * Total Other Duplicated Funds * * * $82,523,300 25 Federal Receipts 26 1002 Federal Receipts 225,729,000 27 * * * Total Federal Receipts * * * $225,729,000 28 * * * Total Budget * * * $380,109,200 29 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 5 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Administrative Systems Updates (HD 1- 628,700 628,700 10 40) 11 Leased Warehouse Repairs and 100,000 100,000 12 Improvements (HD 1-40) 13 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 4,277,767 4,277,767 14 Commission Risk Based Data 15 Management System Upgrade (HD 1-40) 16 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 40,000,000 40,000,000 17 Commission Orphaned Well Performance 18 Grants (HD 1-40) 19 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 25,000,000 25,000,000 20 Commission Orphaned Well Formula 21 Grants (HD 1-40) 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 Flood Mitigation for Acquisition of High 2,500,000 2,500,000 26 Hazard Areas in the Matanuska-Susitna 27 Borough (HD 9-24) 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 National Recreational Trails Federal Grant 600,000 600,000 01 Program (HD 1-40) 02 * * * * * * * * * * 03 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 04 * * * * * * * * * * 05 Alaska Marine Highway System Vessel 6,500,000 6,500,000 06 Overhaul, Annual Certification and 07 Shoreside Facilities Rehabilitation (HD 1-40) 08 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 4 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 05 1002 Federal Receipts 65,000,000 06 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission 4,277,767 07 Receipts 08 1219 Emerging Energy Technology Fund 728,700 09 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $70,006,467 10 Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs 11 1002 Federal Receipts 2,500,000 12 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $2,500,000 13 Department of Natural Resources 14 1002 Federal Receipts 600,000 15 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $600,000 16 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 17 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 6,500,000 18 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $6,500,000 19 * * * Total Budget * * * $79,606,467 20 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 4 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General Funds 05 * * * Total Unrestricted General Funds * * * $0 06 Designated General Funds 07 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 6,500,000 08 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission 4,277,767 09 Receipts 10 * * * Total Designated General Funds * * * $10,777,767 11 Other Non-Duplicated Funds 12 * * * Total Other Non-Duplicated Funds * * * $0 13 Other Duplicated Funds 14 1219 Emerging Energy Technology Fund 728,700 15 * * * Total Other Duplicated Funds * * * $728,700 16 Federal Receipts 17 1002 Federal Receipts 68,100,000 18 * * * Total Federal Receipts * * * $68,100,000 19 * * * Total Budget * * * $79,606,467 20 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. ALASKA HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION. (a) Section 14(b), ch. 1, 02 SSSLA 2021, as amended by sec. 20, ch. 1, FSSLA 2023, and sec. 11(a), ch. 7, SLA 2024, is 03 amended to read: 04 (b) The amount of federal receipts received for the support of rental relief, 05 homeless programs, or other housing programs provided under federal stimulus 06 legislation, estimated to be $131,000,000 [$127,000,000], is appropriated to the 07 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for that purpose for the fiscal years ending 08 June 30, 2021, June 30, 2022, June 30, 2023, June 30, 2024, [AND] June 30, 2025, 09 and June 30, 2026. 10 (b) Section 60(g), ch. 11, SLA 2022, as amended by sec. 11(b), ch. 7, SLA 2024, is 11 amended to read: 12 (g) Designated program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3) received by the 13 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, estimated to be $40,000,000, for administration 14 of housing and energy programs on behalf of a municipality, tribal housing authority, 15 or other third party are appropriated to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for 16 the fiscal years ending June 30, 2023, June 30, 2024, [AND] June 30, 2025, and 17 June 30, 2026. 18 * Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. Section 60(d), ch. 1, SSSLA 2021, as amended by 19 secs. 23(b) and 67(x), ch. 11, SLA 2022, is amended to read: 20 (d) The sum of $40,000,000 is appropriated from federal receipts received 21 from sec. 9901, P.L. 117-2 (Subtitle M—Coronavirus State and Local Fiscal Recovery 22 Funds, American Rescue Plan Act of 2021) to the Department of Health, division of 23 public health, emergency programs, for responding to public health matters arising 24 from COVID-19 for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2023, June 30, 2024, [AND] 25 June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 26 * Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF LAW. (a) The sum of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the 27 general fund to the Department of Law, civil division, special litigation and appeals, for the 28 purpose of ongoing litigation brought by A Better Childhood Inc., for the fiscal years ending 29 June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 30 (b) The sum of $2,756,227 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 31 Law, civil division, deputy attorney general’s office, for the purpose of paying judgements 01 and settlements against the state for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. 02 * Sec. 10. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR. The unexpended and unobligated balance on 03 June 30, 2025, of the Alaska capital income fund (AS 37.05.565) is appropriated to the Office 04 of the Governor for statewide critical deferred maintenance, renovation, and repair. 05 * Sec. 11. DEBT AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) Section 47(g), ch. 7, SLA 2024, is 06 amended to read: 07 (g) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from 08 the specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 09 2025: 10 (1) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 11 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010A, 12 estimated to be $0 [$2,229,468], from the amount received from the United States 13 Treasury as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Build 14 America Bond credit payments due on the series 2010A general obligation bonds; 15 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 16 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010A, after 17 the payment made in (1) of this subsection, estimated to be $0 [$6,754,939], from the 18 general fund for that purpose; 19 (3) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 20 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, 21 estimated to be $2,259,773, from the amount received from the United States Treasury 22 as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School 23 Construction Bond interest subsidy payments due on the series 2010B general 24 obligation bonds; 25 (4) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 26 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, after 27 the payment made in (3) of this subsection, estimated to be $2,403,900, from the 28 general fund for that purpose; 29 (5) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 30 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, 31 estimated to be $434,570, from the amount received from the United States Treasury 01 as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School 02 Construction Bond interest subsidy payments due on the series 2013A general 03 obligation bonds; 04 (6) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 05 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, after 06 the payments made in (5) of this subsection, estimated to be $460,839, from the 07 general fund for that purpose; 08 (7) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 09 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2015B, 10 estimated to be $11,461,500 [$11,966,500], from the general fund for that purpose; 11 (8) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 12 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016A, 13 estimated to be $9,358,000 [$10,381,125], from the general fund for that purpose; 14 (9) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 15 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016B, 16 estimated to be $9,579,375 [$10,304,125], from the general fund for that purpose; 17 (10) the sum of $511,245 from the investment earnings on the bond 18 proceeds deposited in the capital project funds for the series 2020A general obligation 19 bonds, for payment of debt service and accrued interest on outstanding State of Alaska 20 general obligation bonds, series 2020A; 21 (11) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 22 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, after 23 the payment made in (10) of this subsection, estimated to be $6,526,505, from the 24 general fund for that purpose; 25 (12) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 26 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2023A, 27 estimated to be $18,384,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 28 (13) the amount necessary for payment of trustee fees on outstanding 29 State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010A, 2010B, 2013A, 2015B, 30 2016A, 2016B, 2020A, and 2023A, estimated to be $3,450, from the general fund for 31 that purpose; 01 (14) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment to 02 the United States Treasury for arbitrage rebate and payment of tax penalties on 03 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, estimated to be $50,000, from 04 the general fund for that purpose; 05 (15) if the proceeds of state general obligation bonds issued are 06 temporarily insufficient to cover costs incurred on projects approved for funding with 07 these proceeds, the amount necessary to prevent this cash deficiency, from the general 08 fund, contingent on repayment to the general fund as soon as additional state general 09 obligation bond proceeds have been received by the state; and 10 (16) if the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 11 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds exceeds the amounts 12 appropriated in this subsection, the additional amount necessary to pay the obligations, 13 from the general fund for that purpose; 14 (17) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and 15 accrued interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 16 2024A, estimated to be $3,623,467, from the general fund for that purpose; 17 (18) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and 18 accrued interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 19 2024B, estimated to be $1,912,228, from the general fund for that purpose. 20 * Sec. 12. FUND CAPITALIZATION. The unexpended and unobligated balance, estimated 21 to be $3,000,000, of the appropriation made in sec. 4, ch. 7, SLA 2020, page 9, lines 20 - 21 22 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, earthquake relief - federally ineligible 23 costs - $3,000,000), is reappropriated to the disaster relief fund (AS 26.23.300). 24 * Sec. 13. Section 1, ch. 8, SLA 2024, page 14, lines 5 - 7, is repealed. 25 * Sec. 14. LAPSE OF APPROPRIATIONS. (a) The appropriation made in sec. 12 of this 26 Act is for the capitalization of a fund and does not lapse. 27 (b) The appropriations made in secs. 4 and 10 of this Act are for capital projects and 28 lapse under AS 37.25.020. 29 * Sec. 15. RETROACTIVITY. If this Act takes effect after June 30, 2025, this Act is 30 retroactive to July 1, 2024. 31 * Sec. 16. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.